Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 6 Drug Testing for State Employment

Cross references.

Drug testing of recipients of TANF benefits, §

49-4-193

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, Article 5 of Chapter 20 of Title 45, as enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2046, § 1, was renumbered as Article 6 of Chapter 20 of Title 45, as Ga. L. 1990, p. 2028, § 1 already enacted an Article 5 of Chapter 20 of Title 45.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 667, §§ 1 and 3, effective July 1, 1995 and applicable with respect to certain persons entering state employment on or after July 1, 1995, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article. The former article consisted of Code Sections

45-20-110

through 45-20-112 and was based on Code 1981, §§

45-20-110

through 45-20-112, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 2046, § 1.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 667, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides the statement of legislative findings regarding the necessity for drug testing of applicants for state employment.

45-20-110.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Applicant” means a candidate who is offered public employment with any agency, department, commission, bureau, board, college, university, institution, or authority of any branch of state government or who has commenced employment but has not submitted to an established test for illegal drugs.

“Established test” means the collection and testing of bodily fluids administered in a manner equivalent to that required by the Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs (HHS Regulations 53 Fed. Reg. 11979, et seq., as amended).

“Illegal drug” means marijuana/cannabinoids (THC), cocaine, amphetamines/methamphetamines, opiates, opioids, opioid analgesics, opioid derivatives, or phencyclidine (PCP). Such term shall not include any drug when used pursuant to a valid prescription or when used as otherwise authorized by state or federal law.

“Job” means a defined set of key responsibilities and performance standards encompassing one or more positions sufficiently similar in responsibilities and performance standards to be grouped together.

“Medical review officer” means a properly licensed physician who reviews and interprets results of drug testings and evaluates those results together with medical history or any other relevant biomedical information to confirm positive and negative results.

“Position” means a set of duties and responsibilities assigned or delegated by competent authority for performance by one person.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 667, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642; Ga. L. 2018, p. 205, § 1/HB 701.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in paragraph (3), inserted “opioids, opioid analgesics, opioid derivatives” in the first sentence, and substituted “Such term” for “The term ‘illegal drug’ ” at the beginning of the second sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, commas were deleted following “Regulations” and “53” in paragraph (2).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 169 (2018).

For note on 1995 amendments of this Code section and §

45-20-111

, see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 328 (1995).

45-20-111.
Analysis of positions warranting established test; testing requirements, cost, and procedure; disqualification from employment for refusing test or showing positive results.

The head of each agency, department, commission, bureau, board, college, university, institution, or authority shall ensure an analysis is completed on all jobs in his or her organization to determine those positions whose duties and responsibilities warrant conducting an established test for illegal drugs in accordance with the provisions of this Code section. The analysis must be completed by July 1, 1995. All jobs established after this date must undergo a similar analysis no later than six weeks after establishment. An applicant for a designated position shall undergo a drug test consistent with these provisions.

An applicant for state employment who is offered employment in a position designated by the head of the agency, department, commission, bureau, board, college, university, institution, or authority as requiring a drug test shall, prior to commencing employment or within ten days after commencing employment, submit to an established test for illegal drugs. All costs of such testing shall be paid from public funds by the employing agency or unit of state government. Any such test which indicates the presence of illegal drugs shall be followed by a confirmatory test using gas chromatography/mass spectrometry analysis. If the results of the confirmatory test indicate the presence of illegal drugs, such results shall be reviewed and interpreted by a medical review officer to determine if there is an alternative medical explanation. If the applicant provides appropriate documentation and the medical review officer determines that it was a legitimate usage of the substance, the result shall be reported as negative. Any applicant who fails to provide an alternative medical explanation shall be reported by the medical review officer as having a positive test result. Any applicant offered employment who refuses to submit to an established test for illegal drugs or whose test results are positive shall be disqualified from employment by the state. Such disqualification shall not be removed for a period of two years from the date that such test was administered or offered, whichever is later. The board shall develop rules for the administration of the test and any verification procedures. Other covered units of state government shall also develop rules governing these procedures. The results of such tests shall remain confidential and shall not be a public record unless necessary for the administration of these provisions or otherwise mandated by other state or federal law.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 667, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 546, § 20/SB 230; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “July 1, 1995” was substituted for “the effective date of this article” in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”